Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB743.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 147A.090 is amended to read as follows:
Each district board of directors shall have the power, duty, and authority to:
(1) Establish such functional advisory committees as may be necessary and advisable.
These functional advisory committees shall be organized to meet such guidelines as
may be required for federal or state assistance;
(2) Conduct the necessary research and studies and coordinate and cooperate with all
appropriate groups and agencies in order to develop, and adopt and revise, when
necessary, a district development plan or series of plans, including, but not limited
to, the following districtwide plan elements:
(a) Goals and objectives;
(b) Water and sewer;
(c) Land-use; and
(d) Open space and recreation.
Such plans shall serve as a general guide for public and private actions and
decisions to assure the development of public and private property in the most
appropriate relationships;
(3) Prepare annually a report of its activities to the cities and counties within the
district, the legislature, and the Governor. The board shall make copies of the report
available to members of the public within the district;
(4) Comply with the provisions of KRS 65A.010 to 65A.090;
(5) Cooperate with the Kentucky Mountain Regional Recreation Authority established
in KRS 148.0222 for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and promoting
recreational trails to increase economic development, tourism, and outdoor
recreation for Kentucky's residents and visitors, not only in eastern Kentucky but
throughout the Commonwealth; and
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 2/25/2026 11:08 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 2355
(6) Cooperate with the Kentucky Ohio River Regional Recreation Authority
established in KRS 148.034 for the purpose of establishing, maintaining, and
promoting recreational trails to increase economic development, tourism, and
outdoor recreation for Kentucky's residents and visitors, not only along the Ohio
River but throughout the Commonwealth.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 2/25/2026 11:08 AM Jacketed